Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-190
Tattoo, defined.

Tattoo means the conspicuous curvilinear marks or patterns brought about by pricking a pigment coloration into the skin of an animal by using a needle or similar device or the act of marking, coloring, or pricking into the skin of an animal coloring matter or ink which forms an indelible mark or figure.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 21.